Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.010

General duties.

(1) The county treasurer:

(a) Shall receive all money due the county and disburse it on warrants issued and attested by the county auditor and electronic funds transfer under RCW 39.58.750 as attested by the county auditor;

(b) Shall issue a receipt in duplicate for all money received other than taxes; the treasurer shall deliver immediately to the person making the payment the original receipt and the duplicate shall be retained by the treasurer;

(c) Shall designate as cleared or redeemed in the appropriate county accounting records, the date of redemption or, in the case of proper contract between the treasurer and a qualified public depositary, the treasurer may consider the date cleared or redeemed by the financial institution as the date of redemption;

(d) May, in cases where there are insufficient funds for the redemption of warrants issued by the county or any taxing district for which the county treasurer acts as treasurer, using such funds as not necessary for immediate expenditure, contract with the county or any taxing district for a mutually agreed upon period of time, including for appropriate interest to cover such insufficient funds prior to the issuance of said warrants. In each instance, the county or any taxing district shall not issue additional warrants against funds where a contract is in place with the county treasurer without first contacting the county treasurer and, if necessary, renegotiating a contract to cover such additional funding as may be mutually agreed to;

(e) Shall maintain financial records reflecting receipts and disbursement by fund in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

(f) Shall account for and pay all bonded indebtedness for the county and all special districts for which the county treasurer acts as treasurer;

(g) Shall invest all funds of the county or any special district in the treasurer's custody, not needed for immediate expenditure, in a manner consistent with appropriate statutes. If cash is needed to redeem warrants issued from any fund in the custody of the treasurer, the treasurer shall liquidate investments in an amount sufficient to cover such warrant redemptions;

(h) May provide certain collection services for county departments; and

(i) May contract with another county treasurer, the state treasurer, or both, for any duty or service performed by the contracting county treasurer, except that no contracted treasurer may perform a duty that is in conflict with his or her own duties as treasurer or that is in conflict with any other statutory or ethical requirements.

(2) The treasurer, at the expiration of the term of office, shall make a complete settlement with the county legislative authority, and shall deliver to the successor all public money, books, and papers in the treasurer's possession.

(3) Money received by all entities for whom the county treasurer serves as treasurer must be deposited within twenty-four hours in an account designated by the county treasurer unless a waiver is granted by the county treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.09.240.

[ 2023 c 75 s 1; 2019 c 20 s 1; 2005 c 502 s 2; 2002 c 168 s 4; 2001 c 299 s 4; 1998 c 106 s 3; 1995 c 38 s 4; 1994 c 301 s 7; 1991 c 245 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.29.010. Prior: (i) 1893 c 104 s 1; Code 1881 s 2740; 1863 p 553 s 3; 1854 p 427 s 3; RRS s 4109. (ii) Code 1881 s 2742; 1863 p 553 s 5; 1854 p 427 s 5; RRS s 4110. (iii) Code 1881 s 2743; 1863 p 553 s 6; 1854 p 427 s 6; RRS s 4111. (iv) 1895 c 73 s 4; Code 1881 s 2744; 1863 p 553 s 7; 1854 p 427 s 7; RRS s 4113. (v) Code 1881 s 2745; 1863 p 553 s 8; RRS s 4114. (vi) 1893 c 104 s 3; Code 1881 s 2748; 1863 p 554 s 11; 1854 p 428 s 11; RRS s 4120. (vii) Code 1881 s 2750; 1863 p 554 s 13; 1854 p 428 s 13; RRS s 4121. (viii) 1895 c 73 s 3; RRS s 4122.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 502: See note following RCW 1.12.070.

Acts of municipal officers ratified and confirmed—1995 c 38: See note following RCW 3.02.045.